Washington statutes.
RCW 9.40.130

Incendiary devices—Exceptions.

RCW 9.40.120, as now or hereafter amended, shall not prohibit the authorized use or possession of any material, substance, or device described therein by a member of the armed forces of the United States or by firefighters, or peace officers, nor shall these sections prohibit the use or possession of any material, substance, or device described therein when used solely for scientific research or educational purposes or for any lawful purpose. RCW 9.40.120, as now or hereafter amended, shall not prohibit the manufacture or disposal of an incendiary device for the parties or purposes described in this section.

[ 2007 c 218 s 62; 1971 ex.s. c 302 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 79 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 302: See note following RCW 9.41.010.